Utah statutes.
76-10-908.   Violation by dealer -- Penalty -- Local regulation not less
stringent.
(1)  Any dealer who violates any of the provisions of this part is guilty of a
class C misdemeanor.
(2)  This section does not impair the power of counties, cities, or
incorporated municipalities in this state to license, tax, and regulate any
junk dealer, except that local regulations may not be any less stringent than
the provisions in this part.
